Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.190.080

Institutional education providers—Professional development.

(1) Institutional education providers shall annually deliver to all staff providing an institutional education program one day of professional development that builds pedagogical strategies to navigate the intersectionality of factors impacting student learning, including trauma, and physical, mental, and behavioral health in order to achieve academic milestone progression. At a minimum, the professional development must include training on the following topics:

(a) The cognitive, psychosocial, and emotional development of adolescents;

(b) Mental and behavioral health literacy;

(c) The complex needs of students involved in the juvenile justice system, including the trauma associated with incarceration or voluntary or involuntary commitment in a long-term psychiatric inpatient program;

(d) Racial literacy and cultural competency, as defined in RCW 28A.410.260; and

(e) Working with adolescents with many adverse childhood experiences.

(2) In addition to the professional learning allocations provided in RCW 28A.150.415, the legislature shall provide and the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate to institutional education providers one professional learning day of funding to provide the professional development required under this section.

[ 2021 c 164 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 164: See note following RCW 28A.190.005.